North Dakota, session 69, HB1616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-02-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-02-15. Voter lists and reports may be made available for election-related
purposes - Funds received.
1. Except as otherwise provided by law, a voter list or a report generated from the central
voter file may be made available to a candidate, political party, or a political
committeeany person located within or outside the state for election-related purposes.
Any information obtained by a candidate, political party, or political committeeperson
for election-related purposes from a list or report generated from the central voter file
may not be sold or distributed for a purpose that is not election-related. Except for
information identified in the central voter file under subsections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7,
and 10 of section 16.1-02-12, which may be made available to a candidate, political
party, or political committeeperson for election-related purposes, information in the
central voter file is an exempt record.
2. An individual's record that is designated as "secured active" is an exempt record and
is not available to any candidate, political party, or political committeeperson for any
purpose , except for information identified under subsections 1, 2, and 7 of section
16.1 - 02 - 12 .
3. Any information submitted by a requesting party to the secretary of state to obtain
information under subsection 2 is an exempt record .
Page No. 1 25.1321.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. Any funds received by the secretary of state to pay the cost of producing a report or
list of voters contained in the central voter file must be deposited in the secretary of
state's general services operating fund.
Page No. 2 25.1321.01000